Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-320
Designated county official, defined.

Until the implementation date designated
under section 23-186 by the director, designated county official
means the county official, other than the county treasurer, designated by
a county board to provide services pursuant to section 23-186. On and after the implementation date designated under section
23-186 by the director, designated county official means the county treasurer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 20;

Laws 2009, LB49, § 8.